Utah statutes.
78A-6-309.   Pretrial and adjudication hearing -- Time deadlines.
(1)  Upon the filing of a petition, the clerk of the court shall set the
pretrial hearing on the petition within 15 calendar days from the later of:
(a)  the date of the shelter hearing; or
(b)  the filing of the petition.
(2)  The pretrial may be continued upon motion of any party, for good cause
shown, but the final adjudication hearing shall be held no later than 60
calendar days from the later of:
(a)  the date of the shelter hearing; or
(b)  the filing of the petition.
